Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

§ 2-4-101.
Rule of descent; generally; dower and curtesy abolished.

Whenever any person having title to any real or personal property having the nature or legal character of real estate or personal estate undisposed of, and not otherwise limited by marriage settlement, dies intestate, the estate shall descend and be distributed in parcenary to his kindred, male and female, subject to the payment of his debts, in the following course and manner:

If the intestate leaves husband or wife and children, or the descendents of any children surviving, one-half (1/2) of the estate shall descend to the surviving husband or wife, and the residue thereof to the surviving children and descendents of children, as hereinafter limited;

If the intestate leaves husband or wife and no child nor descendents of any child, then the real and personal estate of the intestate shall descend and vest in the surviving husband or wife.

and (B) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 135, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 135, § 2.

Dower and the tenancy by the curtesy are abolished and neither husband nor wife shall have any share in the estate of the other dying intestate, save as herein provided.

Except in cases above enumerated, the estate of any intestate shall descend and be distributed as follows:

To his children surviving, and the descendents of his children who are dead, the descendents collectively taking the share which their parents would have taken if living;

If there are no children, nor their descendents, then to his father, mother, brothers and sisters, and to the descendents of brothers and sisters who are dead, the descendents collectively taking the share which their parents would have taken if living, in equal parts;

If there are no children nor their descendents, nor father, mother, brothers, sisters, nor descendents of deceased brothers and sisters, nor husband nor wife, living, then to the grandfather, grandmother, uncles, aunts and their descendents, the descendents taking collectively, the share of their immediate ancestors, in equal parts.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 42, § 1; Laws 1877, p. 35, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 2221; R.S. 1899, § 4858; C.S. 1910, § 5727; Laws 1915, ch. 4, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 7002; R.S. 1931, § 88-4001; C.S. 1945, § 6-2501; W.S. 1957, § 2-37; W.S. 1977, §

2-3-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1985, ch. 135, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to right of heirship of adopted persons, see §

2-4-107

. See also §

1-22-114

.

“Descendent” held to include adopted child. —

A son by adoption becomes the legal heir of the intestate brother of his adoptive father who died before the intestate brother, “descendant”, as used in this section, including “child” or “issue”, and therefore, when considered in connection with the adoption statutes, it includes an adopted child. In re Cadwell's Estate, 26 Wyo. 412, 186 P. 499,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1920) (where “descendent” was spelled “descendant”).

Adoption at common law was unknown, and therefore, the adoption of minor children, as well as the rights and liabilities emanating therefrom, are governed by statutory provisions concerning descent, distribution and adoption. In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

Entitlement of siblings of adopted child. —

Where two brothers were adopted by one family and several siblings were not, and where one of the brothers died intestate without any children, a district court erred in determining that the biological siblings were entitled to an inheritance; the other adopted brother's daughter was the only true heir of the decedent. Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003).

Only those persons who are heirs at law

at the time of the death of an individual who dies intestate are entitled to succeed to his estate, and the second adoption of the plaintiff terminated the parent-child relationship so that he was not the adopted child of the decedent at the time of the decedent's death. Rist v. Taylor, 955 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1998).

Equitable adoption. —

If decedent had died intestate, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-4-101(c)(i), would have applied, and the “simple” question as to decedent's “predeceased” stepchild would have been whether to apply equitable adoption so that the stepchild would have been considered decedent's child for purposes of intestate succession; however, the Wyoming Supreme Court declined to apply the doctrine of equitable adoption to affect the distribution of a testate estate, and the predeceased stepchild's children were not entitled to a residuary share. Sanderson v. Bathrick (In re Estate of Seader), 2003 WY 119, 76 P.3d 1236,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2003).

Bequest to “blood relations.” —

A bequest “to any of my blood relations I give $100.00 each, they are to establish their relationship by filing in court an affidavit to that effect within one year after my death,” was held not to mean blood relations to an unlimited degree, but only those who would take under statutes of distribution. In re Gilchrist's Estate, 50 Wyo. 153, 58 P.2d 431,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 153, 58 P.2d 431,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1936).

Antenuptial agreements are not contrary to public policy

of this state. In re Estate of Borton, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

The supreme court of Wyoming has long favored agreements between husband and wife entered into voluntarily as family settlement of their affairs. In re Estate of Borton, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

And agreements contrary to laws of descent and distribution authorized. —

A valid marriage settlement agreement making provision contrary to the laws of descent and distribution is specifically authorized under this section. In re Estate of Borton, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

Although results contrary to section. —

The very purpose of the provision of this section allowing marriage settlements contemplates a result contrary to this section, disproportionate as it might be. In re Estate of Borton, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

Allegations that antenuptial agreement is inequitable, unjust and unreasonably disproportionate

are affirmative matters, and the burden of proof never shifts; but opposite party may be required to go forward with evidence to rebut a prima facie case. In re Estate of Borton, 393 P.2d 808,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1964).

Absence of children, parents, siblings, spouse, and descendents. —

Where the only surviving relatives of the decedent were first cousins and descendents, subsection (c)(iii) required that the decedent's estate be distributed to the root generation comprised of the deceased grandfather, grandmother, uncles, and aunts per capita and then to their descendents per stirpes, rather than to the nearest living generation (the first cousins) as the root generation per capita and to their descendents per stirpes. Fosler v. Collins (In re Estate of Fosler), 13 P.3d 686,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 2000).

Finding of undue influence. —

Where the deceased originally left the residue and remainder of his property to his wife and two children of a previous marriage in equal shares and five days later executed a deed to his wife conveying his entire ranch to her after he allegedly changed his mind and she told him such a deed was necessary if she was to receive more than one-fourth of the ranch (this being an incorrect statement of law even if she had told him she would be restricted to such a portion of the estate only if his will was invalidated), this is evidence of undue influence by the wife. Brug v. Case, 600 P.2d 710,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1979).

Federal act relating to dower held inapplicable. —

Section 18 of act of congress of March 3, 1887, ch. 397, 24 Stat. 635, conferring and regulating the right of dower did not annul or supersede the Wyoming statutes on the subject, but applied to the territory of Utah only. France v. Connor, 161 U.S. 65, 16 S. Ct. 497, 40 L. Ed. 619, 1896 U.S. LEXIS 2138 (U.S. 1896).

Rights of inheritance vest immediately on death of intestate.

In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

And devolutionary rights must be determined in relation to that date.

In re Estate of Randall, 506 P.2d 432,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1973).

Value of estate determined upon death of intestate, not when suit brought. —

Upon the death of the intestate, some 50 years prior to the bringing of a quiet title action by an alleged heir, title to his entire mineral estate, the value of which was at that time well below $20,000, passed to his wife, although the value of the property was arguably over $20,000 when the suit was brought. Compton v. Davis Oil Co., 607 F. Supp. 1221, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20337 (D. Wyo. 1985) (decided prior to 1985 amendment).

Matter considered res judicata. —

Where, in a prior case, a court adjudged the title to certain mineral rights to pass under the rules of descent, if that judgment is res judicata as to this issue, it applies to both parties in a later action concerning the question of the passage of the mineral rights where they each claim by virtue of the rules of descent. Roush v. Roush, 589 P.2d 841,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1979).

Administrator is not agent of heirs,

does not derive his powers from them and is not subject to their control. In re Rigby's Estate, 62 Wyo. 401, 167 P.2d 964,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1946).

Where administrator was selling land for purposes stated in order of sale, he was not acting as agent of decedent or his heirs, and the lessees had no preference over other bidders at public sale of land, which was subject to lease an option. In re Rigby's Estate, 62 Wyo. 401, 167 P.2d 964,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1946).

And has no title to real estate. —

Under this section and §

2-7-104

, executor or administrator, as such, has no title to real estate and cannot sue to establish resulting trust to land and compel a conveyance. Cook v. Elmore, 25 Wyo. 393, 171 P. 261,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1918).

Applied

in

Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984); Butler v. Halstead, 770 P.2d 698,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Fray v. Fray, 721 P.2d 1054,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 572

(Wyo. 1986); Peters v. Peters, 2001 WY 71, 29 P.3d 90,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2001).

Stated

in

In re Estate of Boyd, 606 P.2d 1243,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1980); In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Oct. 14, 2014).

Cited

in

Coliseum Motor Co. v. Hester, 43 Wyo. 298, 3 P.2d 105,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1931); Booth v. Hackney, 516 P.2d 180,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1973); Jordan v. Delta Drilling Co., 541 P.2d 39,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 169

, 78 A.L.R.3d 1215 (Wyo. 1975); Gates v. Richardson, 719 P.2d 193,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 549

(Wyo. 1986); Macaraeg v. Wilson, 749 P.2d 272,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1988); Franks v. Indep. Prod. Co., 2004 WY 97, 96 P.3d 484,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(2004); Kelly v. Kilts, 2010 WY 151, 243 P.3d 947,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Nov. 23, 2010).

Law reviews. —

See “Effect of Statutory Election for a Surviving Spouse,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 71.

See “Probable Interpretation of Wyoming Rules of Descent,” 11 Wyo. L.J. 120.

See note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?” 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

For case note, “Wrongful Death — Siblings as Beneficiaries Under Wyoming's Wrongful Death Statutes, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1985).

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion ‘Albatross’ Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

For case note, “Trusts & Estates—Spousal Disinheritance—Inter vivos Trusts and Wyoming's Spousal Elective Share. Briggs v. Wyoming Nat'l Bank, 836 P.2d 263,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 323 (1994).

For note, “Intestacy Law — The Dual Generation Dilemma — Wyoming's Interpretation of its 130-Year-Old Intestacy Statute. Fosler v. Collins (In re Estate of Fosler), 13 P.3d 686,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 2000),” see 2 Wyo. L. Rev. 641 (2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What law, in point of time, governs as to inheritance from adoptive parent, 18 ALR2d 960.

Descent and distribution to nieces and nephews as per stirpes or per capita, 19 ALR2d 191.

Veteran dying in Veterans' Administration facility without spouse or heirs, constitutionality of federal statute as to disposition of personal property of, 36 A.L.R.2d 725.

Adoption as affecting the right of inheritance through or from natural parent or other natural kin, 37 ALR2d 333.

Right of adopted child to inherit from kindred of adoptive parent, 43 ALR2d 1183.

What law, in point of time, governs inheritance from or through adopted person, 52 ALR2d 1228.

Descent and distribution to and among cousins, 54 ALR2d 1009.

Descent and distribution to and among uncles and aunts, 55 ALR2d 643.

Descent and distribution from stepparents to stepchildren or vice versa, 63 ALR2d 303.

Discovery of will, statute dealing with existing intestate administration, upon, 65 ALR2d 1201.

Solid mineral royalty as real or personal property for purposes of descent and distribution, 68 ALR2d 732.

Right of children of adopted child to inherit from the adopting parent, 94 ALR2d 1200.

Family settlement of intestate estate, 29 ALR3d 174.

Construction, application and effect of Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, 39 ALR3d 1332.

Descent and distribution of property of adopted child, 48 ALR3d 818.

Right of adopted child to inherit from intestate natural grandparent, 60 ALR3d 631.

Rights in decedent's estate as between lawful and putative spouses, 81 ALR3d 6.

Estoppel or laches precluding lawful spouse from asserting rights in decedent's estate as against putative spouse, 81 ALR3d 110.

Right of illegitimate grandchildren to take under testamentary gift to “grandchildren,” 17 ALR4th 1292.

Statutory or constitutional provision allowing widow but not widower to take against will and receive dower interests, allowances, homestead rights, or the like as denial of equal protection of law, 18 ALR4th 910.

Eligibility of illegitimate child for survivor's benefits under Social Security Act, pursuant to § 216(h)(2)(A) of Act (42 U.S.C. § 416(h)(2)(A)), where state intestacy law denying inheritance right, or application of that state law to § 216(h)(2)(A), may violate child's right to equal protection of law, 116 ALR Fed 121.

§ 2-4-102.
Rule of descent; illegitimate person. [Repealed]

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 42, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 2230; R.S. 1899, § 4864; C.S. 1910, § 5733; C.S. 1920, § 7008; R.S. 1931, § 88-4007; C.S. 1945, § 6-2509; W.S. 1957, § 2-38; W.S. 1977, §

2-3-102

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 2-4-103.
Posthumous persons.

Persons conceived before the decedent’s death but born thereafter inherit as if they had been born in the lifetime of the decedent.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Pretermitted heir statutes: what constitutes sufficient testamentary reference to, or evidence of contemplation of, heir to render statute inapplicable, 83 ALR4th 779.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

§ 2-4-104.
Kindred of half blood; stepchildren; foster children.

Persons of the half-blood inherit the same share they would inherit if they were of the whole blood, but stepchildren and foster children and their descendents do not inherit.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Equitable adoption. —

Foster children
provision must be interpreted in light of the stated overall goals
of simplicity, clarity, speed, and efficiency, and the doctrine of
equitable adoption is anything but simple, clear, or speedy in application;
Wyoming does not recognize the doctrine of equitable adoption. Therefore,
a claimant was unable to recover from a decedent, who was not her
biological father; the decedent could have adopted the claimant or
provided for her in his will, but did neither. In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129, 336 P.3d 129,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Rights of inheritance as between kindred of whole and half blood, 47 ALR4th 561.

Adopted child as within class named in deed or inter vivos trust instrument, 37 ALR5th 237.

§ 2-4-105.
Alienage not to affect inheritance; exception; burden of proof; when property to escheat to state.

The alienage of the legal heirs shall not invalidate any title to real estate which shall descend or pass from the decedent, except that no nonresident alien who is a citizen of any country foreign to the United States of America, shall by any manner or means acquire real property in this state by succession or testamentary disposition if the laws of the country of which the nonresident alien is a citizen do not allow citizens of the United States of America to take real property by succession or by testamentary disposition.

If a decedent leaves no heirs, devisees or legatees entitled to take real property under the terms of this act, the decedent’s property shall escheat to the state of Wyoming as now provided by law for escheat property.

The burden of proof is upon a nonresident alien to establish the existence of reciprocal rights asserted by him.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1977, §§

2-3-107

,

2-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” should probably read “this section” since its provisions were originally derived entirely from ch. 107, Laws 1959. For the present meaning of the term “this act”, see §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Effect of treaty. —

While art. 1, § 29, Wyo. Const., permitting resident aliens to inherit same as citizens and former statute providing that alienage of “descendants” should not invalidate title to real estate by “descent” would not permit collateral nonresident aliens to take, such collaterals, living in Ireland, might take under provision of treaty with Great Britain that, on death of any person holding real property within the territories of one country, relatives in the other would not be disqualified as aliens. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

The treaty with Great Britain providing for inheritance of real property in one country by heirs of decedent in another will control and suspend the common law in force in Wyoming during such times, as all rights conferred thereby are in force or extended by the courts pursuant thereto. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

The word “territories” as used in treaty between the United States and Great Britain providing for inheritance of real property in each country by heirs living in other includes any area or locality under the dominion of the United States and is applicable to states. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Under treaty with Great Britain providing that heirs living in one country might inherit real estate from decedent dying in the other country, such heirs to be allowed three years in which to sell the lands, all of their rights did not cease ipso facto at expiration of the three years, since the time might be prolonged, and a decree in favor of the heirs in view of the recent expiration of such period and pendency of action which might prevent a sale extended such time. Bamforth v. Ihmsen, 28 Wyo. 282, 204 P. 345,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 28 Wyo. 282, 205 P. 1004,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1922).

Alien heir may convey before escheat action begun. —

Alien heir whose estate is subject to defeat by state's action to enforce escheat may dispose of property in good faith and convey title good against the world before commencement of escheat action. Dutton v. Donahue, 44 Wyo. 52, 8 P.2d 90,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1932).

Applied

in

Macaraeg v. Wilson, 749 P.2d 272,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 2-4-106.
Divorce not to affect children's rights.

Divorces of husband and wife do not affect the right of children to inherit their property.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 42, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 2228; R.S. 1899, § 4863; C.S. 1910, § 5732; C.S. 1920, § 7007; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 144; R.S. 1931, § 88-4006; C.S. 1945, § 6-2508; W.S. 1957, § 2-45; W.S. 1977, §

2-3-110

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS
146 (Oct. 14, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Separation agreement as affecting right of inheritance, 34 ALR2d 1020, 34 ALR2d 1039.

§ 2-4-107.
Determination of relationship of parent and child.

If for purposes of intestate succession, a relationship of parent and child shall be established to determine succession by, through or from a person:

An adopted person is the child of an adopting parent for inheritance purposes, but the adoption of a child by the spouse of a natural parent has no effect on the relationship between the child and that natural parent for inheritance purposes;

An adopted person shall inherit from all other relatives of an adoptive parent as though he was the natural child of the adoptive parent and the relatives shall inherit from the adoptive person’s estate as if they were his relatives;

In cases not covered by paragraph (i) of this subsection, a person born out of wedlock is a child of the mother. That person is also a child of the father, if the relationship of parent and child has been established under the Uniform Parentage Act, W.S.

14-2-401

through

14-2-907

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2; 2015 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(i), deleted “and of natural parents” following “adopting parent,” added “for inheritance purposes” at the end; and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

In re Estate of Ronald, 2014 WY 129, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS
146 (Oct. 14, 2014).

Only those persons who are heirs at law

at the time of the death of an individual who dies intestate are entitled to succeed to his estate, and the second adoption of the plaintiff terminated the parent-child relationship so that he was not the adopted child of the decedent at the time of the decedent's death. Rist v. Taylor, 955 P.2d 436,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1998).

Entitlement of siblings of adopted child. —

Where two brothers were adopted by one family and several siblings were not, and where one of the brothers died intestate without any children, a district court erred in determining that the biological siblings were entitled to an inheritance; the other adopted brother's daughter was the only true heir of the decedent. Shippey v. Rogers (In re Estate of Kirkpatrick), 2003 WY 125, 77 P.3d 404,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 2-4-108.
Advancements generally; exceptions; determination.

If a person dies intestate, property which he gave in his lifetime to an heir is treated as an advancement against the latter’s share of the estate only if declared in a contemporaneous writing by the decedent or acknowledged in writing by the heir to be an advancement. For this purpose the property advanced is valued as of the time the heir came into possession or enjoyment of the property. If the recipient of the property fails to survive the decedent, the property is not taken into account in computing the intestate share to be received by the recipient’s issue, unless the declaration or acknowledgment provides otherwise.

The maintenance, education or supply of money to a minor, without any view to apportion or settlement in life, is not deemed an advancement under this section.

When any heir of the intestate receives in his lifetime any real or personal estate by way of advancement, and the other heirs desire it to be charged to him, the judge shall cite the parties to appear before him, shall hear proof upon the subject, and shall determine the amount of such advancement or advancements to be thus charged.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Ademption through advancement can operate only if transfer were gift.

If the transfer were otherwise, it would not be chargeable against a legacy as an advancement on it or a satisfaction of it, inasmuch as the legacy itself is a gift. In re Estate of Scott, 642 P.2d 1287,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Check as evidencing advancement, 74 ALR5th 491.